North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 2. Director of the Budget.

§ 143C-2-1.
Governor is Director of the Budget.

Governor is Director of the Budget. — The Governor is the Director of the Budget. In that capacity, the Governor is required by Article III, Section 5(3) of the North Carolina Constitution to prepare and recommend a budget and to administer the budget as enacted by the General Assembly. The Governor’s powers under this Chapter extend to all agencies, institutions, departments, bureaus, boards, and commissions of the State of North Carolina under whatever name now or hereafter known. The Governor may delegate the authority to perform a power or duty of the Director under this Chapter to the Office of State Budget and Management or to one or more persons.

State Agencies and Non-State Entities to Provide Information Requested by the Director; Examination of Persons and Agencies by Director. — Upon request, all State agencies and non-State entities subject to this act shall furnish the Director, in the form and at the time requested by the Director, any information desired by the Director in relation to their respective activities or fiscal affairs so long as the information is not confidential pursuant to federal or State law. The Director may subpoena and examine under oath any person directly or indirectly responsible for the operations of any executive State agency or any non-State entity subject to the provisions of this Chapter.

Governor May Request State Auditor to Audit State Agency or Non-State Entity Receiving State Funds. — As authorized by G.S. 147-64.6(c)(3), the Governor may request the State Auditor to make an audit of or cause an audit to be made of the books and accounts of any State agency and may require that the cost of the audit be borne by the State agency. The Governor may also request the State Auditor to make an audit of or cause an audit to be made of the books and records of any non-State entity receiving State funds pursuant to the State Auditor’s authority granted in

G.S. 147-64.7

.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

Annual Follow-up Analyses of Human Resources/Payroll Function Mapping Analysis.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 6.7.(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of State Controller and the Office of State Personnel, shall conduct annual follow-up analyses of the Human Resources/Payroll Function Mapping Analysis that was completed in fiscal year 2007 by the BEACON staff and the Office of State Budget and Management. This initial analysis was conducted to provide not only a pre-implementation assessment of State agency Human Resources/Payroll staffing prior to BEACON HR/Payroll implementation but also to provide a basis on which new HR/Payroll roles required by BEACON implementation can be mapped. These follow-up analyses of State agency HR/Payroll staffing shall be completed by January 1 of each year to assure the staffing levels remain appropriate. The annual staffing analyses shall be conducted throughout the implementation of the BEACON HR/Payroll System and shall continue for a reasonable time after the implementation to assure that the staffing levels are adjusted based on the increased efficiency provided by the implementation.

“(b) The Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of State Controller, shall conduct a staffing analysis of the business functions of State government to include, but not be limited to, agency fiscal offices, budget offices, and procurement offices to be completed by April 30, 2008.
This initial analysis will serve as a pre-implementation assessment of State agency business functions staffing prior to the proposed implementation of the remaining components of the BEACON ERP System.
Follow-up analyses shall be conducted annually and completed by January 1 of each year to assure the staffing levels remain appropriate.
The annual staffing analyses shall be conducted throughout the implementation of future BEACON components and shall continue for a reasonable time after the implementation to assure that the staffing levels are adjusted based on the increased efficiency provided by the implementation.

“(c) By April 30, 2008, the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of State Controller, and then by January 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of State Controller and the Office of State Personnel, shall report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee, to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations/Base Budget, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, and to the Fiscal Research Division on the results of the annual staffing analyses of State government business functions conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and on the implementation of the BEACON HR/Payroll System.

“(d) Prior to any staffing changes that result from the staffing analyses conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of State Controller and the Office of State Personnel, shall report to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee, to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Appropriations/Base Budget, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, and to the Fiscal Research Division on the annual staffing analyses of State government business functions conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and on the proposed implementation of the remaining components of the BEACON ERP System.

“(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Office of State Budget and Management may evaluate the impact of the BEACON Program on affected agencies and develop a plan for addressing resources affected by the Program.
The State Redeployment Plan shall be implemented to the extent possible. When compliance with federal or State law requires, a new position may be created if a current or contracted position is eliminated.
The Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Office of the State Controller, shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations within 30 days for each employee change made under the State Redeployment Plan and shall include a five-year fiscal impact incurred by the State when converting any contracted position to a permanent position.
This subsection expires June 30, 2008.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 24.3, effective July 1, 2014, repealed Session Laws 2007-323, s. 6.7(a)-(e).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2007’.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 22.5 provides: “The Office of State Budget and Management shall conduct a staffing survey of all State agencies and universities that use the BEACON system and determine the number of FTE staff assigned to BEACON training. The Office of State Budget and Management shall submit a final report outlining its findings and staffing recommendations to the House Appropriations Subcommittee on General Government, the Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on General Government and Information Technology, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 1, 2009.”

In order to provide for adequate funding in the Medicaid budget for the 2011-2012 fiscal year, Session Laws 2012-2, s. 1(a)-(c), Session Laws 2012-57, s. 1(a)-(c), and Session Laws 2012-142, ss. 6.14(a), (b), 6.15, and 10.9G, allow for certain extraordinary budget adjustments. These Session Laws are noted in full under

G.S. 143C-4-3

.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.5(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall contract for a Government Efficiency and Reform review and analysis of the executive branch of State government, which shall be known as NC GEAR. The purpose of the review and analysis is to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of State government and to identify specific strategies for making State government more efficient and effective. The review and analysis may examine entire departments, agencies, institutions, or similar programs in different departments. The review and analysis shall include an examination of the efficiency and effectiveness of major management policies, practices, and functions pertaining to the following areas:

“(1) The statutory authority, funding sources, and functions of each department, agency, institution, or program.

“(2) The organizational structure and staffing patterns in place to perform these functions and whether they are appropriate based on comparative data and other reasonable staffing criteria.

“(3) The measurement of each reviewed program’s outcomes, overall performance, and success in accomplishing its mandated or stated mission and subsequent goals, considering the resources provided to the program.

“(4) State and local responsibilities for providing government services and funding for those services, and whether these responsibilities should be reallocated.

(5) Personnel systems operations and management.

“(6) State purchasing operations and management.

“(7) Information technology and telecommunications systems policy, organization, and management.

“(8) The identification of opportunities to reduce fragmentation, duplication, and related or overlapping services or activities through restructuring of departmental organizations and streamlining programs.

“(b) All executive branch departments, agencies, boards, commissions, authorities, and institutions in the executive branch of State government, including receipt-supported agencies, and all non-State entities receiving State funds shall be subject to review and analysis. The chief administrative officer of each entity shall ensure full cooperation with the Office of State Budget and Management and provide timely responses to the Office of State Budget and Management’s request for information under the provisions of G.S. 143C-2-1(b).

“(c) The Office of State Budget and Management will work collaboratively with the Office of State Auditor to develop the review, analysis, and findings needed to produce a final report and recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly.

“(d) The contracting provisions of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and related State purchasing and budget regulations do not apply to NC GEAR; however, the Office of State Budget and Management shall report all external contracts for consultants or professional services within 30 days of their execution to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Fiscal Research Division, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(e) The Office of State Budget and Management shall submit an interim report of the NC GEAR’s analysis, findings, and recommendations to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Program Evaluation Division by February 15, 2014, and a final report by February 15, 2015.

“(f) Funds appropriated for NC GEAR shall be used to contract with consultants and other experts and to pay for travel, postage, printing, planning, and other related costs as needed to accomplish the objectives specified for the project. Funds appropriated for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium for NC GEAR shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available for expenditure for the project.”

§ 143C-2-2.
Collection of State Budget Statistics.

The Director shall coordinate the efforts of governmental agencies to collect, disseminate, and analyze economic, demographic, and social statistics pertinent to State budgeting. The Director shall do all of the following:

Prepare and release the official demographic and economic estimates and projections for the State.

Conduct special economic and demographic analyses and studies to support statewide budgeting.

Develop and coordinate cooperative arrangements with federal, State, and local governmental agencies to facilitate the exchange of data to support State budgeting.

Report major trends that influence revenues and expenditures in the State budget in the current fiscal year and that may influence revenues and expenditures over the next five fiscal years.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-2-3.
Fiscal analysis required for any State agency bill that affects the budget.

A State agency proposing a bill that affects the State budget shall prepare a fiscal analysis for the bill and submit the analysis to the Fiscal Research Division upon introduction of the bill. The fiscal analysis shall estimate the impact of the legislation on the State budget for the first five fiscal years the legislation would be in effect.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-2-4.
Director of the Budget may direct State Treasurer to borrow money for certain payments.

The Director of the Budget, by and with the consent of the Governor and Council of State, may authorize and direct the State Treasurer to borrow in the name of the State, in anticipation of the collection of taxes, such sum as may be necessary to make the payments on the appropriations as even as possible and to preserve the best interest of the State in the conduct of the various State agencies during each fiscal year.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-2-5.
Grants and contracts database.

The Director of the Budget shall require the Office of State Budget and Management, with the support of the Department of Information Technology, to build and maintain a database and Web site for providing a single, searchable Web site on State spending for grants and contracts to be known as NC OpenBook.

The head of each State institution, department, bureau, agency, or commission, or a designee, shall conduct a quarterly review of all State contracts and grants administered by that agency.

All State institutions, departments, bureaus, agencies, or commissions that maintain a Web site shall be required to include an access link to the NC OpenBook Web site on the home page of the agency Web site. Each agency shall also prominently display a search engine on the agency Web site home page to allow for ease of searching for information, including contracts and grants, on the agency’s Web site.

History.

2010-169, s. 9; 2015-114, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 7A.4(aa).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-114, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, rewrote subsection (b); and in the first sentence of (c), deleted “subject to the authority of the Director of the Budget” following “commissions.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.4(aa), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Information Technology” for “Office of Information Technology Services” in subsection (a).

§ 143C-2-6.
Contents of database and Web site.

The Office of State Controller, the Department of Administration, and the Department of Information Technology shall provide the Office of State Budget and Management with the statewide information on State contracts necessary for the development and maintenance of the database and Web site required by this Article, with the information updated at least monthly.

The Office of State Budget and Management shall work with the Office of the State Auditor and the Grant Information Center to incorporate data on grants into the database and Web site required by this Article. All State institutions, departments, bureaus, agencies, or commissions subject to the authority of the Governor shall make necessary changes to existing reporting processes for contracts and grants to ensure the goals of this Article are met.

All State contracts and grants awarded in amounts in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be included in the database and Web site required by this Article. The following information shall be provided for each contract or grant:

The name of the entity receiving the award.

The amount of the award or estimated award.

Information on the award, including type of transaction, funding agency, and duration of the contract or grant.

The location of the entity receiving the award.

Background information on the entity receiving the award.

Time lines for anticipated completion of the work required.

Expected outcomes of the contract or grant and specific deliverables required.

Contact information for the responsible State government officer or administrator of the contract or grant.

History.

2010-169, s. 9; 2015-241, s. 7A.4(bb).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.4(bb), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Information Technology” for “Office of Information Technology Services” in subsection (a).